Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Chapter 155. Search Warrants

§ 4701.
Issuance of search warrants for code violations.

A district judge may issue a warrant to any law enforcement officer or official inspector for searching in the daytime a dwelling house or other premises for violations of local codes or ordinances.

HISTORY:

Amended 1969, No. 210 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 4, 1970; 1973, No. 118, § 13, eff. Oct. 1, 1973; 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 49, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 4702.
Affidavit.

A search warrant shall not be granted pursuant to section 4701 of this title except upon the oath of a law enforcement officer or official inspector that he or she has reason to suspect and does suspect that the premises are in violation of a local code or ordinance.

HISTORY:

Amended 1969, No. 210 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 24, 1970; 1973, No. 118, § 14, eff. Oct. 1, 1973.

§ 4703.
Payment of fees.

When the State’s Attorney of a county in which a search is to be made applies for a search warrant or certifies in writing on the warrant that the search ought to be made, the fees for such warrant and the service thereof shall be paid by the State.

HISTORY:

Amended 1973, No. 118, § 15, eff. Oct. 1, 1973; 2017, No. 93 (Adj. Sess.), § 13.